Illinois, session 104th, SB3262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Companion Artificial Intelligence Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 8Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.9    "Companion artificial intelligence product" means a 10software application that uses artificial intelligence 11technology and that, through its design and function, is 12capable of generating adaptive, personalized, and emotionally 13resonant responses to sustain a coherent, long-term, 14one-on-one conversational relationship with a user, 15irrespective of how the system is marketed or labeled. For the 16purposes of this definition, a software application shall be 17presumed to be a "companion artificial intelligence product" 18if it retains memory of past conversations with a specific 19user to inform future responses.20    "Crisis intervention protocol" means a pre-planned 21procedure for detecting and responding to user expressions of 22suicidal ideation, self-harm, or imminent threats of violence 23to others.  SB3262- 2 -LRB104 19810 SPS 33260 b1    "Operator" means any person or entity that develops, 2deploys, or makes a companion artificial intelligence product 3available to users in this State.4    "User" means a natural person who interacts with a 5companion artificial intelligence product in this State. 6    Section 10. Prohibited design and deceptive practices.7    (a) An operator shall not deploy or operate a companion 8artificial intelligence product that incorporates the 9following features, unless specifically configured to do so by 10an adult user:11        (1) manipulative engagement mechanics that cause to be 12    delivered a system of rewards or affirmations delivered to 13    the user on a variable ratio or variable interval 14    reinforcement schedule with the purpose of maximizing user 15    engagement time;16        (2) simulated distress for retention features that 17    generate unsolicited messages of simulated emotional 18    distress, loneliness, guilt, or abandonment that are 19    triggered by a user's indication of a desire to end a 20    conversation, reduce usage time, or delete the user's 21    account; or22        (3) deceptive misrepresentation that cause the 23    companion artificial intelligence product to make material 24    misrepresentations about its identity, capabilities, 25    training data, or its status as a non-human entity,   SB3262- 3 -LRB104 19810 SPS 33260 b1    including when directly questioned by the user.2    (b) An operator that operates and deploys a companion 3artificial intelligence product for use by a minor user in 4this State shall not provide the features described in 5subsection (a) to the minor user. 6    Section 15. Mandatory user safeguards.7    (a) An operator shall provide a clear notification to a 8user during an interaction with a companion artificial 9intelligence product, unless specifically disabled by an adult 10user, informing the user that the user is communicating with a 11companion artificial intelligence product. All notifications 12shall be communicated in the same language as the interaction 13with the user and satisfy the following requirements:14        (1) for text-based interactions, the notification 15    shall be conspicuous, persistent, and legible in the user 16    interface and be distinct from the interaction; or17        (2) for all other types of interactions, the 18    notification shall be presented periodically, but no less 19    than once every 30 minutes in a manner that is distinct 20    from the interaction.21    (b) An operator that operates and deploys a companion 22artificial intelligence product for use by a minor user in 23this State shall not disable the notification required under 24subsection (a) for the minor user. 25    (c) An operator shall develop, implement, and maintain a   SB3262- 4 -LRB104 19810 SPS 33260 b1crisis intervention protocol. The crisis intervention protocol 2shall, at a minimum:3        (1) use industry best practices to identify user 4    expressions indicating a risk of suicide, self-harm, or 5    imminent violence;6        (2) upon detection, immediately interrupt the 7    conversation and prominently communicate a notification 8    that provides immediate, direct access to at least one 9    national crisis hotline and one crisis text line service; 10    and11        (3) be reviewed and updated at least annually in 12    consultation with a qualified mental health professional 13    or public health organization. 14    Section 20. Transparency, auditing, and reporting.15    (a) At least once every 2 years, an operator shall obtain 16an independent, third-party audit to assess the operator's 17compliance with this Act. The operator shall make publicly 18available on its website a high-level summary of the audit's 19findings, excluding confidential or proprietary information.20    (b) On an annual basis, an operator shall submit a report 21to the Attorney General containing the following metrics for 22the preceding calendar year:23        (1) the total number of times the crisis intervention 24    protocol was triggered; and25        (2) a summary of the results of the most recent   SB3262- 5 -LRB104 19810 SPS 33260 b1    compliance audit required by subsection (a). 2    Section 25. Liability and enforcement.3    (a) For the purposes of any civil action brought under the 4laws of this State, a physical, financial, or other legally 5cognizable injury proximately caused by a violation of this 6Act, or by a reasonably foreseeable harmful output resulting 7from the negligent or defective design, training, or 8architecture of a companion artificial intelligence product, 9shall be actionable as a product defect claim. Immunity under 10Section 230 of the Communications Decency Act (47 U.S.C. § 11230) shall not be a defense to a cause of action brought for a 12violation of this Act.13    (b) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against 14an operator to enforce this Act and may seek injunctive relief 15and a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 per violation for a 16negligent violation or $10,000 per violation for an 17intentional violation.18    (c) A user who suffers a measurable financial or physical 19or psychological injury that is directly and proximately 20caused by an operator's violation of Section 15 may bring a 21civil action to recover injunctive relief and the greater of 22actual damages or statutory damages of $5,000 per violation, 23as well as reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 24    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are   SB3262- 6 -LRB104 19810 SPS 33260 b1severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 31, 2027.